tests/kik.lexc
LEXICON CopVerbSubjectConcord 

%[%-p1%]%[%-sg%]:%{N%}%{N2%}%{N3%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-pl%]:%{T%}%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-pl%]:m%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl1%]%[%-sg%]:%{A%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-cl1%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl3%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-cl3%]%[%-pl%]:%{yĨ%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-cl5%]%[%-sg%]:r%{Ĩ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl5%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl7%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{Ĩ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl7%]%[%-pl%]:%{C%}%{I%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl9p6%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ĩ%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-cl9p6%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl9p1%0%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ĩ%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-cl9p1%0%]%[%-pl%]:%{C%}%{I%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p6%]%[%-sg%]:%{R%}%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p6%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p1%0%]%[%-sg%]:%{R%}%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p1%0%]%[%-pl%]:%{C%}%{I%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p6%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p6%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p13%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p13%]%[%-pl%]:%{T%}%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl14%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbTense ;
%[%-cl14%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl15%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl15%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl16%]%[%-sg%]:ha%> CopVerbNeg2 ; 
%[%-cl17%]%[%-sg%]:k%{Ũ%}%> CopVerbNeg2 ;

! %{N%}%{N2%}%{N3%}%>%{T%}%{I%}%>%{

LEXICON CopVerbNeg2

%[%-neg%]:%{T%}%{I%}%> CopVerbTense ;
CopVerbTense ;

LEXICON CopVerbTense

%[%-rempast%]:%{A%}%> CopRoot1 ;
%[%-nearpast%]:r%{A%}%> CopRoot1 ;
%[%-currpast%]:%{NULL%} CopRoot2 ;
%[%-pres%]:%{NULL%} CopRoot1 ;

LEXICON CopRoot1

rĩ%<cop%>:r%{Ĩ%} CopTenseAgreement ;
rĩ%<cop%>%[%+pres%]%<pres%>:%{Ĩ%} CopNegAgreement ;

LEXICON CopRoot2

ri%<cop%>:%{U%}ma CopTenseAgreement ;

LEXICON CopTenseAgreement

%[%+rempast%]%<rempast%>:%{NULL%} CopNegAgreement ;
%[%+nearpast%]%<nearpast%>:%{NULL%} CopNegAgreement ;
%[%+currpast%]%<currpast%>:%{NULL%} CopNegAgreement ;
%[%+pres%]%<pres%>:%{NULL%} CopNegAgreement ;

LEXICON CopNegAgreement

%[%+neg%]%<neg%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectConcordAgreement ;
CopSubjectConcordAgreement ;

LEXICON CopSubjectConcordAgreement

%[%+p1%]%<p1%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;
%[%+cl1%]%<p3%>%<cl1%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 1
%[%+cl3%]%<p3%>%<cl3%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 3
%[%+cl5%]%<p3%>%<cl5%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 6
%[%+cl7%]%<p3%>%<cl7%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 7
%[%+cl9p6%]%<p3%>%<cl9p6%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;   ! Noun class 9p6
%[%+cl9p1%0%]%<p3%>%<cl9p1%0%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 9p1%0
%[%+cl11p6%]%<p3%>%<cl11p6%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 11p6
%[%+cl11p1%0%]%<p3%>%<cl11p1%0%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 11p1%0
%[%+cl12p6%]%<p3%>%<cl12p6%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement  ; ! Noun class 12p6
%[%+cl12p13%]%<p3%>%<cl12p13%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ; ! Noun class 12p13
%[%+cl14%]%<p3%>%<cl14%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;   ! Noun class 14
%[%+cl15%]%<p3%>%<cl15%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;   ! Noun class 15
%[%+cl16%]%<p3%>%<cl16%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;   ! Noun class 16
%[%+cl17%]%<p3%>%<cl17%>:%{NULL%} CopSubjectNumberAgreement ;   ! Noun class 17

LEXICON CopSubjectNumberAgreement

%[%+sg%]%<sg%>:%{NULL%} # ;
%[%+pl%]%<pl%>:%{NULL%} # ;

LEXICON VerbPrefix

VerbFoc ;
%[%-imp%]:%{NULL%}%> VerbStem ;
%[%-inf%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbStem ;
Copula ;

LEXICON VerbFoc

%[%-foc%]:n%{Ĩ%}%> VerbNeg1 ;
VerbNeg1 ;

LEXICON VerbNeg1

%[%-neg%]:n%{D%}%> VerbSubjectConcord ;
VerbSubjectConcord ;

LEXICON VerbSubjectConcord

%[%-p1%]%[%-sg%]:%{N%}%{N2%}%{N3%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-pl%]:%{T%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ũ%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-pl%]:m%{Ũ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl1%]%[%-sg%]:%{A%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-cl1%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl3%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ũ%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-cl3%]%[%-pl%]:%{Ĩ%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-cl5%]%[%-sg%]:r%{Ĩ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl5%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl7%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{Ĩ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl7%]%[%-pl%]:%{C%}%{I%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl9p6%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ĩ%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-cl9p6%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl9p1%0%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ĩ%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-cl9p1%0%]%[%-pl%]:%{C%}%{I%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p6%]%[%-sg%]:%{R%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p6%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p1%0%]%[%-sg%]:%{R%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl11p1%0%]%[%-pl%]:%{C%}%{I%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p6%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p6%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p13%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl12p13%]%[%-pl%]:%{T%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl14%]%[%-sg%]:%{Ũ%}%> VerbTense ;
%[%-cl14%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl15%]%[%-sg%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbNeg2 ;
%[%-cl15%]%[%-pl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbNeg2 ;

LEXICON VerbNeg2

%[%-neg%]:%{T%}%{I%}%> VerbTense ;
VerbTense ;

LEXICON VerbTense

!NOTE TO SELF: nd- 1sg prefix before currpast/rempast(?) noasp a

%[%-rempast%]%[%-perf%]%[%-compl%]%[%-hab%]:%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ;
%[%-rempast%]%[%-perf%]%[%-compl%]%[%-hab%]:%{BLOCK%}%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ; !needed to relax into aa... maybe better modeled with spellrelax? annoying.
%[%-nearpast%]%[%-perf%]%[%-compl%]%[%-hab%]%[%-noasp%]:%{R%}%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ;
%[%-currpast%][%-perf%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ; ! maybe hab? noasp?
%[%-currpast%]%[%-noasp%]:%{BLOCK%}%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ; ! maybe hab? maybe compl?
%[%-currpast%]%[%-compl%]:%{NULL%} VerbObjectAgreement ;
%[%-pres%]%[%-noasp%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ; ! existence is dubious, see ndũkagũe, whose meaning is not really what we are going for with present... even though that's how it glosses. appears only in imperatives, conditionals
%[%-pres%]%[%-noasp%]%[%-proc%]:%{RAR%}%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ;
%[%-pres%]%[%-hab%]%[%-perf%]:%{NULL%} VerbObjectAgreement ; ! highly dubious... but exists sometimes like in nĩainaga. probably just homophonic with the other aga
%[%-currfut%]%[%-noasp%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ; ! maybe habitual is possible ???
%[%-remfut%]%[%-noasp%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ;
%[%-seq%]%[%-noasp%]:%{K%}%{Ĩ%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ;
%[%-seq%]%[%-noasp%]:%{K%}%{I%}%> VerbObjectAgreement ; ! alternate spelling, possibly biblical

LEXICON VerbObjectAgreement

!%[%-sp1%]%[%-ssg%]:%{N%}%{N2%}%{N3%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-sp1%]%[%-spl%]:%{T%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-sp2%]%[%-ssg%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-sp2%]%[%-spl%]:m%{U%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl1%]%[%-ssg%]:m%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl1%]%[%-spl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl3%]%[%-ssg%]:m%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl3%]%[%-spl%]:m%{Ĩ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl5%]%[%-ssg%]:%{R%}{Ĩ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl5%]%[%-spl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl7%]%[%-ssg%]:%{K%}%{Ĩ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl7%]%[%-spl%]:c%{I%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl9p1%0%]%[%-ssg%]:m%{Ĩ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl9p1%0%]%[%-spl%]:c%{I%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl11p1%0%]%[%-ssg%]:%{R%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl11p1%0%]%[%-spl%]:c%{I%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl12p13%]%[%-ssg%]:%{K%}%{A%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl12p13%]%[%-spl%]:%{T%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl14%]%[%-ssg%]:%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl14%]%[%-spl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl15%]%[%-ssg%]:%{K%}%{Ũ%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-scl15%]%[%-ssg%]:%{K%}%{U%}%> VerbReflexive ; ! should fix
!%[%-scl15%]%[%-spl%]:m%{A%}%> VerbReflexive ;
!%[%-noobj%]:%{NULL%} VerbReflexive ;
VerbReflexive ;

LEXICON VerbReflexive

%[%-refl%]:%{Ĩ%}%> VerbStem ;
VerbStem ;

LEXICON VerbAfterStem

%<v%>%[%+imp%]%<imp%>:%{A%} # ;
%<v%>%[%+inf%]%<inf%>:%{A%} # ;
VerbTenseAgreement ;

LEXICON VerbRecip

%<recip%>:%>%{A%}n VerbIntens ;
VerbIntens ;

LEXICON VerbIntens

%<intens%>:%>%{Ĩ%}rĩr VerbMid ;
%<intens%>:%>%{Ũ%}rũr VerbMid ;
VerbMid ;

LEXICON VerbStem
har:har VerbAfterStem ; ! prepare
ũkĩr:%{Ũ%}kĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! wake.up
tega:tega VerbAfterStem ; ! 
gan:gan VerbAfterStem ; ! narrate
rũg:%{R%}ũg VerbAfterStem ; ! jump
ag:%{A%}g VerbAfterStem ; ! fail
um:%{U%}m VerbAfterStem ; ! come.out
kiny:%{K%}iny VerbAfterStem ; ! arrive
kũr:%{K%}ũr VerbAfterStem ; ! grow
ũk:%{Ũ%}k VerbAfterStem ; ! come
in:%{I%}n VerbAfterStem ; ! sing
thi:th%{II%} VerbAfterStem ; ! go
thi:th%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! go
thom:thom VerbAfterStem ; ! read
thamb:thamb VerbAfterStem ;
rĩm:%{R%}ĩm VerbAfterStem ; ! cultivate
haic:haic VerbAfterStem ;
on:%{O%}n VerbAfterStem ;
ror:%{R%}or VerbAfterStem ;
gũ:g%{Ũ%} VerbAfterStem ; ! fall
ũr:%{Ũ%}r VerbAfterStem ; ! run away
cok:%{C%}ok VerbAfterStem ; ! return
cooker:%{C%}ooker VerbAfterStem ; ! say(?) (meaning is  fairly confusing, but common in Bible)
ik:%{I%}k VerbAfterStem ; ! throw
nyit:nyit VerbAfterStem ; ! catch
tin:tin VerbAfterStem ; ! cut
hanyũk:hanyũk VerbAfterStem ; ! run
ikar:ikar VerbAfterStem ; ! stay/sit
rĩ:%{R%}%{Ĩ%} VerbAfterStem ; ! eat
ririkan:%{R%}irikan VerbAfterStem ; ! remember
ĩtĩk:%{Ĩ%}tĩk VerbAfterStem ; ! believe
iy:%{I%}y VerbAfterStem ; ! steal
igu:%{I%}g%{U%} VerbAfterStem ; ! hear / obey
ug:%{U%}g VerbAfterStem ; ! say
ĩr:%{Ĩ%}r VerbAfterStem ; ! tell
dũm:dũm VerbAfterStem ; ! send
tuĩk:%{T%}uĩk VerbAfterStem ; ! become
end:%{E%}nd VerbAfterStem ; ! want
thambĩr:thambĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! swim
ringĩr:%{R%}ingĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! persuade
hing:hing VerbAfterStem ; ! close
amb:%{A%}mb VerbAfterStem ; ! start
ĩrĩgĩr:%{Ĩ%}rĩgĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! intend
ĩtĩkĩr:%{Ĩ%}tĩkĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! allow
rut:%{R%}ut VerbAfterStem ; ! learn, teach, or remove
ribot:%{R%}ibot VerbAfterStem ; ! report
anĩrĩr:%{A%}nĩrĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! announce
ĩcir:%{Ĩ%}cir VerbAfterStem ; ! think
ĩtu:%{Ĩ%}t%{U%} VerbAfterStem ; ! pretend
rot:%{R%}ot VerbAfterStem ; ! dream
ĩrir:%{Ĩ%}rir VerbAfterStem ; ! regret
ken:{%K%}en VerbAfterStem ; ! be happy
rakar:%{R%}akar VerbAfterStem ; ! be angry
ĩhok:%{Ĩ%}hok VerbAfterStem ; ! hope
no:n%{O%} VerbAfterStem ; ! can/must (?)
hot:hot VerbAfterStem ; ! might
tũm:%{T%}ũm VerbAfterStem ; !
ũm:%{Ũ%}m VerbAfterStem ; ! dry
h%[%-fvE%]:h VerbAfterStem ; ! give
hith:hith VerbAfterStem ; ! hide
humb:humb VerbAfterStem ; ! cover
ĩk:%{tĨ%}k VerbAfterStem ; ! put
thek:thek VerbAfterStem ; ! laugh
tah:tah VerbAfterStem ; ! fetch
ihũg:%{I%}hũg VerbAfterStem ; ! to get wet
heenere:heenere VerbAfterStem ; ! deceive
tũũr:tũũr VerbAfterStem ; ! live (or live somewhere)
nyu:nyu VerbAfterStem ; ! drink
it:%{I%}t VerbAfterStem ; ! pour
ur:%{U%}r VerbAfterStem ; ! rain
hũr:hũr VerbAfterStem ; ! beat
tig:%{T%}ig VerbAfterStem ; ! leave
on:%{O%}n VerbAfterStem ; ! see
ĩt:%{Ĩ%}t VerbAfterStem ; ! call
hĩtũki:hĩtũk%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! pass (exceed)
twar:%{T%}war VerbAfterStem ; ! take, or drive
ku:k%{U%} VerbAfterStem ; ! die
ũri:%{Ũ%}r%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! ask
maki:mak%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! scare
hot:hot VerbAfterStem ; ! can (as in be able)
ig:ig VerbAfterStem ; ! put
rath:rath VerbAfterStem ; ! predict
ĩk:%{Ĩ%}k VerbAfterStem ; ! do
bay:bay VerbAfterStem ; ! wrap
thir:thir VerbAfterStem ; ! fail
onek:%{O%}nek VerbAfterStem ; ! appear
meny:meny VerbAfterStem ; ! know
ambatĩri:%{A%}mbatĩr%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! advance (in status)
rũgam:rũgam VerbAfterStem ; ! stand
ken:ken VerbAfterStem ; ! rejoice
maki:mak%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! surprise
cari:car%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! search
amũkĩr:%{A%}mũkĩr VerbAfterStem ; ! accept
reki:rek%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! send
ari:%{A%}r%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! discuss
tu:t%{U%} VerbAfterStem ; ! decide
ĩhũg:%{Ĩ%}hũg VerbAfterStem ; ! watch
iki:%{I%}k%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! throw
buĩri:buĩr%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! disappear
ĩti:%{Ĩ%}t%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! to plead (as in plead guilty)
ĩhumb:%{Ĩ%}humb VerbAfterStem ; ! wear
thuurũkani:thuurũkan%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! analyse
kaani:kaan%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! prohibit
cay:%{C%}ay VerbAfterStem ; ! complain
rĩmi:rĩm%{I%} VerbAfterStem ; ! earn
rot:rot VerbAfterStem ; ! dream
